North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-51 Oil and Gas Gross Production Tax
57-51-15.
Gross production tax allocation.

The gross production tax must be allocated monthly as follows:

The tax revenue collected under this chapter equal to one percent of the gross value at the well of the oil and one-fifth of the tax on gas must be deposited with the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall allocate the funding in the following order:

Eight percent of the amount available under this subsection to the North Dakota outdoor heritage fund, but not in an amount exceeding twenty million dollars per fiscal year.

Four percent of the amount available under this subsection to the abandoned oil and gas well plugging and site reclamation fund, but not in an amount exceeding seven million five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year and not in an amount that would bring the balance in the fund to more than fifty million dollars.

Any remaining revenues pursuant to subsection 3.

For purposes of this subsection, “fiscal year” means the period beginning September first and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.

The tax revenue collected under this chapter equal to four percent of the gross value at the well of the oil and four-fifths of the tax on gas must be deposited with the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall allocate the funding in the following order:

The first five million dollars of collections received from a county each fiscal year is allocated to the county.

The remaining revenue collections received from a county each fiscal year are allocated thirty percent to the county and seventy percent as follows:

Monthly amounts to the hub city funding pool to provide fifteen million four hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year for the allocations under paragraph 2 of subdivision a of subsection 5.

Monthly amounts to the hub city school district funding pool to provide two million one hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year for the allocations under paragraph 3 of subdivision a of subsection 5.

Monthly amounts to the supplemental school district funding pool to provide seventy percent of the total amount needed for the allocations under paragraph 4 of subdivision a of subsection 5.

Any remaining revenue collections to the state for the state’s allocations pursuant to subsection 3.

For purposes of this subsection, “fiscal year” means the period beginning September first and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.

After the allocations under subsections 1 and 2, the amount remaining is allocated first to provide for deposit of thirty percent of all revenue collected under this chapter in the legacy fund as provided in section 26 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota and the remainder must be allocated to the state general fund. If the amount available for a monthly allocation under this subsection is insufficient to deposit thirty percent of all revenue collected under this chapter in the legacy fund, the state treasurer shall transfer the amount of the shortfall from the state general fund share of oil extraction tax collections and deposit that amount in the legacy fund.

For a county that received less than five million dollars of allocations under subsection 2 in the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, revenues allocated to that county must be distributed by the state treasurer as follows:

Forty-five percent must be distributed to the county treasurer and credited to the county general fund. However, the distribution to a county under this subdivision must be credited to the state general fund if in a taxable year after 2012 the county is not levying a total of at least ten mills for combined levies for county road and bridge, farm-to-market and federal aid road, and county road purposes.

Thirty-five percent must be distributed proportionally to school districts within the county on the average daily attendance distribution basis for kindergarten through grade twelve students residing within the county, as certified to the state treasurer by the county superintendent of schools. However, a hub city school district must be omitted from distributions under this subdivision.

Twenty percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities of the county. A hub city must be omitted from distributions under this subdivision. Distributions among cities under this subsection must be proportional based upon the population of each incorporated city according to the last official decennial federal census. In determining the population of any city in which total employment increases by more than two hundred percent seasonally due to tourism, the population of that city for purposes of this subdivision must be increased by eight hundred percent.

For purposes of this subsection, “fiscal year” means the period beginning September first and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.

For a county that received five million dollars or more of allocations under subsection 2 in the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, revenues allocated to that county must be distributed by the state treasurer as follows:

A portion of the revenues from each county must be distributed to a hub city funding pool, a hub city school district funding pool, and a supplemental school district funding pool as follows:

The amount distributed from each county to the funding pools under this subdivision must be proportional to each county’s monthly oil and gas gross production tax revenue collections relative to the combined total monthly oil and gas gross production tax revenue collections from all the counties that receive allocations under this subsection.

The state treasurer shall distribute, to the hub city funding pool, the monthly amount needed from each county to provide six million six hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year for the allocations under this paragraph.

The state treasurer shall allocate monthly amounts from the hub city funding pool to provide a combined total of twenty-two million dollars per fiscal year to all the hub cities, which includes the fifteen million four hundred thousand dollars under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of subsection 2 and the six million six hundred thousand dollars under this paragraph. The monthly allocation to each hub city must be proportional to each hub city’s impact percentage score, including fractional percentage points rounded to the nearest tenth of a percent, relative to the combined total of all the hub cities’ impact percentage scores.

The state treasurer shall calculate the impact percentage score for each hub city by summing the following:

The percentage of mining, quarrying, and oil and gas extraction employment relative to the total employment of all industries in the county in which the hub city is located, based on the most recent annual data for all ownership types compiled by job service North Dakota in the quarterly census of employment and wages, multiplied by forty-five hundredths;

The average of the percentage of mining, quarrying, and oil and gas extraction employment relative to the total employment of all industries in each county for all the counties in the human service region in which the hub city is located, based on the most recent annual data for all ownership types compiled by job service North Dakota in the quarterly census of employment and wages, multiplied by fifteen hundredths;

The percentage of establishments engaged in mining, quarrying, and oil and gas extraction relative to the total establishments of all industries in the county in which the hub city is located, based on the most recent annual data for all ownership types complied by job service North Dakota in the quarterly census of employment and wages, multiplied by one-tenth;

The percentage of oil production in the human service region in which the hub city is located relative to the total oil production in all the human service regions with hub cities, based on the most recently available calendar year data compiled by the industrial commission in a report on the historical barrels of oil produced by county, multiplied by one-tenth;

The percentage change in population from five years prior for the hub city, based on the most recent actual or estimated census data published by the United States census bureau, multiplied by one-tenth; and

The percentage change in population from five years prior for the county in which the hub city is located, based on the most recent actual or estimated census data published by the United States census bureau, multiplied by one-tenth.

For purposes of this paragraph, “human service region” means the areas designated by the governor’s executive order 1978-12 dated October 5, 1978.

The state treasurer shall distribute, to the hub city school district funding pool, the monthly amount needed from each county to provide nine hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year for the allocations under this paragraph.

The state treasurer shall allocate monthly amounts from the hub city school district funding pool to provide a combined total of three million dollars per fiscal year to all the hub city school districts, which includes the two million one hundred thousand dollars under paragraph 2 of subdivision b of subsection 2 and the nine hundred thousand dollars under this paragraph. The monthly allocation to each hub city school districts must be proportional to each hub city school district’s impact percentage score, including fractional percentage points rounded to the nearest tenth of a percent, relative to the combined total of all the hub cities’ impact percentage scores.

For the purpose of determining the impact percentage score for each hub city school district, the state treasurer shall use the same impact percentage score as the corresponding score calculated for each hub city in paragraph 2.

The state treasurer shall distribute, to the supplemental school district funding pool, the monthly amount needed from each county to provide for thirty percent of the total allocations under this paragraph. To each county that received more than five million dollars but less than thirty million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount from the supplemental school district funding pool which will be added to the distributions to school districts under paragraph 2 of subdivision b, as follows:

To each county that received more than five million dollars but not exceeding ten million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide a total allocation of one million five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year. The allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to paragraph 2 of subdivision b.

To each county that received more than ten million dollars but not exceeding fifteen million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide a total allocation of one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year. The allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to paragraph 2 of subdivision b.

To each county that received more than fifteen million dollars but not exceeding twenty million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide a total allocation of one million dollars per fiscal year. The allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to paragraph 2 of subdivision b.

To each county that received more than twenty million dollars but not exceeding twenty-five million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide a total allocation of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars per fiscal year. The allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to paragraph 2 of subdivision b.

To each county that received more than twenty-five million dollars but not exceeding thirty million dollars of total allocations under subsection 2 in the most recently completed even-numbered fiscal year before the start of the biennium, the state treasurer shall allocate a monthly amount that will provide a total allocation of five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year. The allocation must be distributed to school districts within the county pursuant to paragraph 2 of subdivision b.

After the distributions in subdivision a, each county’s remaining revenues must be distributed as follows:

Sixty percent must be distributed to the county treasurer and credited to the county general fund. However, the distribution to a county under this subdivision must be credited to the state general fund if in a taxable year after 2012 the county is not levying a total of at least ten mills for combined levies for county road and bridge, farm-to-market and federal aid road, and county road purposes.

Five percent must be distributed proportionally to school districts within the county on the average daily attendance distribution basis for kindergarten through grade twelve students residing within the county, as certified to the state treasurer by the county superintendent of schools. However, a hub city school district must be omitted from distributions under this subdivision.

Twenty percent must be distributed to the incorporated cities of the county. A hub city must be omitted from distributions under this subdivision. Distributions among cities under this subsection must be proportional based upon the population of each incorporated city according to the last official decennial federal census. In determining the population of any city in which total employment increases by more than two hundred percent seasonally due to tourism, the population of that city for purposes of this subdivision must be increased by eight hundred percent.

Four percent must be allocated among the organized and unorganized townships of the county. The state treasurer shall allocate the funds available under this subdivision among townships in proportion to each township’s road miles relative to the total township road miles in the county. The amount allocated to unorganized townships under this subdivision must be distributed to the county treasurer and credited to a special fund for unorganized township roads, which the board of county commissioners shall use for the maintenance and improvement of roads in unorganized townships.

Nine percent must be distributed among hub cities. The state treasurer shall distribute the funds available under this subdivision in proportion to the amounts the hub cities receive under paragraph 2 of subdivision a.

Two percent must be distributed among hub city school districts. The state treasurer shall distribute the funds available under this subdivision in proportion to the amounts the hub city school districts receive under paragraph 3 of subdivision a.

For purposes of this subsection, “fiscal year” means the period beginning September first and ending August thirty-first of the following calendar year.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 15; 1957, ch. 368, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5115; S.L. 1963, ch. 408, § 1; 1981, ch. 383, § 4; 1981, ch. 611, § 1; 1983, ch. 656, § 2; 1983, ch. 661, § 1; 1985, ch. 650, § 1; 1987, ch. 723, § 1; 1989, ch. 650, § 3; 1989, ch. 733, § 1; 1991, ch. 689, § 7; 2005, ch. 586, § 1; 2007, 542, § 1; 2007, 543, § 1; 2009, ch. 545, § 31; 2009, ch. 575, § 1; 2011, ch. 485, § 1; 2011, ch. 13, § 6; 2011, ch. 484, § 1; 2013, ch. 408, § 2; 2013, ch. 277, § 10; 2013, ch. 471, § 2; 2015, ch. 379, § 4, effective July 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 463, § 3, effective July 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 465, § 1; 2017, ch. 38, § 16, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 14, § 22, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019; 2019, ch. 504, § 3, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019; 2021, ch. 480, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 57-51-15 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 22 of Chapter 14, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1014; and Section 3 of Chapter 504, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1066.

57-51-15.1.
Energy impact fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 38, § 17, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 13, § 7, effective June 30, 2021.

57-51-16.
Distribution of proceeds in certain cases.

If gross production tax is paid to the commissioner and the reports accompanying such tax are insufficient to enable the commissioner to determine the source, by county, from which it is produced, the state treasurer shall allocate those revenues under this section. In the first distribution to counties under section 57-51-15 which occurs after June gross production tax revenues are received by the state treasurer for allocation, the revenue under this section must be allocated among counties in the same proportions that revenue was allocated among counties that received distributions under section 57-51-15 during the year ended June thirtieth. Revenue received by the county under this section must be allocated within the county as provided in section 57-51-15.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 16; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5116; S.L. 1993, ch. 575, § 1; 1999, ch. 529, § 1; 2021, ch. 56, § 13, effective August 1, 2021.

57-51-17.
Reports by carriers of oil and gas transported — Reports of refiners — Reports by persons purchasing or storing oil.

It is the duty of every railroad company, pipeline company, or transportation company to furnish to the commissioner, upon request, any and all information relative to the transportation of oil or gas subject to gross production tax, that may be required to properly enforce the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner may require any pipeline or transportation company to install suitable measuring devices to enable the company to provide information concerning the quantity of oil or gas transported within, into, out of, or across the state of North Dakota. It is the duty of every person engaged in the operation of a refinery for the processing of oil or gas, in the state of North Dakota, to furnish to the commissioner, upon request, any and all information, relative to oil or gas subject to gross production tax that has been processed by it that may be required to properly enforce the provisions of this chapter. It is the duty of every person engaged in the purchase or storing of oil or gas subject to gross production tax in the state of North Dakota to furnish to the commissioner, upon request, showing the amount of oil or gas in storage, and giving, along with information required, the location, identity, character, and capacity of the storage receptacle in which the oil or gas is stored. Information requested under this section must be provided within forty-five days of the request.

The failure of any person to comply with the provisions of this section makes that person subject to a penalty of twenty-five dollars for each day that person fails or refuses to furnish the information or comply with the provisions of this chapter. Any penalty may be recovered at the suit of the state, on relation of the commissioner. The penalty so collected must be apportioned to the state general fund. The commissioner may, for good cause shown, excuse any or all penalties imposed under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 17; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5117; S.L. 1965, ch. 440, § 3; 1983, ch. 648, § 8; 1989, ch. 732, § 3.

57-51-18.
Payment where ownership is in dispute — Assignment as security. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 689, § 8.

57-51-19.
Claim for credit or refund.

In all cases of overpayment, duplicate payment, or payment made in error, the commissioner may issue a certificate stating therein the facts and the amount of the refund to which the taxpayer may be entitled. Upon presentation of the certificate to the office of management and budget, a warrant shall be issued to the taxpayer for the purpose of refunding any overpayment, duplicate payment, or payment made in error out of the unapportioned gross production tax in the state treasury and a pro rata share thereof must be charged against the county entitled to share in the tax. Interest arising from refunds of overpayments, duplicate payments, and erroneous payments must be allowed and paid at the rate of ten percent per annum and accrues for payment from sixty days after the due date of the return or after the return was filed or after the tax was fully paid, whichever comes later.

A taxpayer may file a claim for credit or refund of an overpayment of tax within three years of the due date of the return or three years after the return was filed. However, if there is a change in tax liability on any return by an amount in excess of twenty-five percent of the amount of tax liability reported on a return, a claim for refund of tax may be filed within six years after the due date of the return or six years after the return was filed, whichever period expires last.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 19; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5119; S.L. 1989, ch. 732, § 4; 1991, ch. 648, § 11; 1993, ch. 576, § 1; 1999, ch. 530, § 3; 2001, ch. 549, § 4.

57-51-19.1.
Minimum refunds and collections.

A refund may not be made by the tax commissioner to any taxpayer unless the amount to be refunded, including interest, is at least five dollars. The tax commissioner shall transfer any amount that is not refunded to a taxpayer under this subsection to the state treasurer for deposit in the same manner as other revenue under this chapter.

A remittance of tax need not be made and any assessment or collection of tax may not be made unless the amount is at least five dollars, including penalties and interest.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 530, § 1.

57-51-20.
Statements as to tax on settlements — Acceptance of deductions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 732, § 5.

57-51-21.
Rules and regulations — Bond — Reports — Actions.

The commissioner may prescribe all necessary rules for making and filing of all reports required hereunder and otherwise necessary to the enforcement of this chapter. The commissioner may require a sufficient bond from any person charged with the making and filing of reports and the payment of the taxes imposed under this chapter. The bond must run to the state of North Dakota and must be conditioned upon the making and filing of reports as required by law, upon compliance with the rules and regulations of the commissioner, and for the prompt payment, by the principal therein, of all taxes justly due the state under this chapter. When any reports required have not been filed, or may be insufficient to furnish all the information required by the commissioner, the commissioner shall institute, in the name of the state of North Dakota upon relation of the commissioner, any necessary action or proceedings in the courts having jurisdiction, to enjoin such person from continuing operations until such reports have been filed as required, and in all proper cases, injunction must issue without bond from the state of North Dakota. Upon showing that the state is in danger of losing its claims or the property is being mismanaged, dissipated, or concealed, a receiver must be appointed at the suit of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 21; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5121.

57-51-22.
Penalty.

Any person intentionally violating any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 22; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5122; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 617.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

57-51-23.
Application of chapter. [Omitted]

Omitted.

Note.

Not repealed but omitted as a statute not of a general and permanent nature. This section can be found as S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 23.